Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-209
County seat; site; surveying; platting.

Such lands shall be surveyed into lots, squares, streets and alleys, and platted and recorded in the county clerk's office; and lots necessary for public buildings shall be reserved by the board for that purpose.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 86, p. 230;

R.S.1913, § 920;

C.S.1922, § 826;

C.S.1929, § 25-209;

R.S.1943, § 22-209.